Utah statutes.
61-1-26.   Scope of the act -- Service of process.
(1)  Section 61-1-1, Subsection 61-1-3(1), Sections 61-1-7, 61-1-15.5,
61-1-17, and 61-1-22 apply to persons who sell or offer to sell when:
(a)  an offer to sell is made in this state; or
(b)  an offer to buy is made and accepted in this state.
(2)  Section 61-1-1, Subsection 61-1-3(1), and Section 61-1-17 apply to
persons who buy or offer to buy when:
(a)  an offer to buy is made in this state; or
(b)  an offer to sell is made and accepted in this state.
(3)  For the purposes of this section, an offer to sell or to buy is made in
this state whether or not either party is then present in this state, when the
offer:
(a)  originates from this state; or
(b)  is directed by the offeror to this state and received at the place to
which it is directed, or at any post office in this state in the case of a
mailed offer.
(4)  For the purposes of this section, an offer to sell or to buy is accepted
in this state when acceptance:
(a)  is communicated to the offeror in this state; and
(b)  has not previously been communicated to the offeror, orally or in
writing, outside this state, and acceptance is communicated to the offeror in
this state, whether or not either party is then present in this state, when
the offeree directs it to the offeror in this state reasonably believing the
offeror to be in this state and it is received at the place to which it is
directed or at any post office in this state in the case of a mailed
acceptance.
(5)  An offer to sell or to buy is not made in this state when:
(a)  the publisher circulates or there is circulated on his behalf in this
state any bona fide newspaper or other publication of general, regular, and
paid circulation which is not published in this state, or which is published
in this state but has had more than 2/3 of its circulation outside this state
during the past 12 months; or
(b)  a radio or television program originating outside this state is received
in this state.
(6)  Section 61-1-2 and Subsection 61-1-3(3), as well as Section 61-1-17 so
far as investment advisers are concerned, apply when any act instrumental in
effecting prohibited conduct is done in this state, whether or not either
party is then present in this state.
(7) (a)  Every application for registration under this chapter and every
issuer which proposes to offer a security in this state through any person
acting on an agency basis in the common-law sense shall file with the
division, in such form as it prescribes by rule, an irrevocable consent
appointing the division or the director to be his attorney to receive service
of any lawful process in any noncriminal suit, action, or proceeding against
him or his successor, executor, or administrator which arises under this
chapter or any rule or order hereunder after the consent has been filed, with
the same force and validity as if served personally on the person filing the
consent.
(b)  A person who has filed such a consent in connection with a previous
registration or notice filing need not file another.
(c)  Service may be made by leaving a copy of the process in the office of the
division, but it is not effective unless the plaintiff, who may be the
division in a suit, action, or proceeding instituted by it, sends notice of
the service and a copy of the process by registered mail to the defendant or
respondent at his last address on file with the division, and the plaintiff's
affidavit of compliance with this subsection is filed in the case on or before
the return day of the process, if any, or within such further time as the
court allows.
(8) (a)  When any person, including any nonresident of this state, engages in
conduct prohibited or made actionable by this chapter or any rule or order
hereunder, and he has not filed a consent to service of process under
Subsection (7) and personal jurisdiction over him cannot otherwise be obtained
in this state, that conduct shall be considered equivalent to his appointment
of the division or the director to be his attorney to receive service of any
lawful process in any noncriminal suit, action, or proceeding against him or
his successor executor or administrator which grows out of that conduct and
which is brought under this chapter or any rule or order hereunder, with the
same force and validity as if served on him personally.
(b)  Service may be made by leaving a copy of the process in the office of the
division, but it is not effective unless the plaintiff, who may be the
division in a suit, action, or proceeding instituted by it, sends notice of
the service and a copy of the process by registered mail to the defendant or
respondent at his last-known address or takes other steps which are reasonably
calculated to give actual notice, and the plaintiff's affidavit of compliance
with this subsection is filed in the case on or before the return day of the
process, if any, or within such further time as the court allows.
(9)  When process is served under this section, the court, or the director
shall order such continuance as may be necessary to afford the defendant or
respondent reasonable opportunity to defend.
